Hawaii statutes.
§88-17 Bonus payment; limitation. No
bonus shall be payable to any person retiring after June 30, 1971;
provided that this limitation shall not apply to bonus payments for retired
patient employees receiving a pension under chapter 326. Such patient employees
including those who retired after June 30, 1971, and prior to July 1,
1976, may continue to receive bonus payments authorized under section 88-11. [L
1961, c 175, pt of §13; Supp, pt of §6-255; pt of HRS §88-16; am L 1969, c 110,
pt of §1; am L 1976, c 139, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next